Illinois, session 104th, SB1898.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Judicial Privacy Act is amended by changing 5Section 1-10 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 90/1-10)7    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Government agency" includes all agencies, authorities, 9boards, commissions, departments, institutions, offices, and 10any other bodies politic and corporate of the State created by 11the constitution or statute, whether in the executive, 12judicial, or legislative branch; all units and corporate 13outgrowths created by executive order of the Governor or any 14constitutional officer, by the Supreme Court, or by resolution 15of the General Assembly; or agencies, authorities, boards, 16commissions, departments, institutions, offices, and any other 17bodies politic and corporate of a unit of local government, or 18school district. 19    "Home address" includes a judicial officer's permanent 20residence and any secondary residences affirmatively 21identified by the judicial officer, but does not include a 22judicial officer's work address. 23    "Immediate family" includes a judicial officer's spouse,   SB1898- 2 -LRB104 10394 JRC 20469 b1child, parent, or any blood relative of the judicial officer 2or the judicial officer's spouse who lives in the same 3residence. 4    "Judicial officer" includes actively employed and former 5or deceased: 6        (1) Justices of the United States Supreme Court and 7    the Illinois Supreme Court;8        (2) Judges of the United States Court of Appeals;9        (3) Judges and magistrate judges of the United States 10    District Court;11        (4) Judges of the United States Bankruptcy Court;12        (5) Judges of the Illinois Appellate Court; and 13        (6) Judges and associate judges of the Illinois 14    Circuit Courts; and . 15        (7) Administrative law judges as defined in Section 16    1-15 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 17    "Personal information" means a home address, home 18telephone number, mobile telephone number, pager number, 19personal email address, social security number, federal tax 20identification number, checking and savings account numbers, 21credit card numbers, marital status, and identity of children 22under the age of 18. 23    "Publicly available content" means any written, printed, 24or electronic document or record that provides information or 25that serves as a document or record maintained, controlled, or 26in the possession of a government agency that may be obtained   SB1898- 3 -LRB104 10394 JRC 20469 b1by any person or entity, from the Internet, from the 2government agency upon request either free of charge or for a 3fee, or in response to a request under the Freedom of 4Information Act.5    "Publicly post" or "publicly display" means to communicate 6to another or otherwise make available to the general public. 7    "Written request" means written notice signed by a 8judicial officer or a representative of the judicial officer's 9employer requesting a government agency, person, business, or 10association to refrain from posting or displaying publicly 11available content that includes the judicial officer's 12personal information. 13(Source: P.A. 100-98, eff. 8-11-17.)